Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.310

Notice—Requirements—Waiver.

(1) Petitions governed by this chapter shall be served in the manner as set forth in the superior court civil rules. Subsequent notice, papers, and pleadings may be served in the manner provided in superior court civil rules.

(2) If personal service on any parent or *alleged father who has not consented to the termination of his or her parental rights can be given, the summons and notice of hearing on the petition to terminate parental rights shall be served at least twenty days before the hearing date if served within the state or thirty days if served outside of this state.

(3) If personal service on the parent or any *alleged father, either within or without this state, cannot be given, notice shall be given: (a) By first-class and registered mail, mailed at least thirty days before the hearing to the person's last known address; and (b) by publication at least once a week for three consecutive weeks with the first publication date at least thirty days before the hearing. Publication shall be in a legal newspaper in the city or town of the last known address within the United States and its territories of the parent or *alleged father, whether within or without this state, or, if no address is known to the petitioner, publication shall be in the city or town of the last known whereabouts within the United States and its territories; or if no address or whereabouts are known to the petitioner or the last known address is not within the United States and its territories, in the city or town where the proceeding has been commenced.

(4) Notice and appearance may be waived by the department, an agency, a parent, or an *alleged father before the court or in a writing signed under penalty of perjury. The waiver shall contain the current address of the department, agency, parent, or *alleged father. The face of the waiver for a hearing on termination of the parent-child relationship shall contain language explaining the meaning and consequences of the waiver and the meaning and consequences of termination of the parent-child relationship. A person or agency who has executed a waiver shall not be required to appear except in the case of an Indian child where consent to termination or adoption must be certified before a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1913(a).

(5) If a person entitled to notice is known to the petitioner to be unable to read or understand English, all notices, if practicable, shall be given in that person's native language or through an interpreter.

(6) Where notice to an Indian tribe is to be provided pursuant to this chapter and the department is not a party to the proceeding, notice shall be given to the tribe at least ten business days prior to the hearing by registered mail return receipt requested.

[ 1995 c 270 s 6; 1987 c 170 s 9; 1985 c 421 s 6; 1984 c 155 s 31.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.33.020 was amended by 2019 c 46 s 5034, changing the definition of "alleged father" to "alleged genetic parent."

Finding—1995 c 270: See note following RCW 74.13A.040.

Severability—1987 c 170: See note following RCW 13.04.030.